Kentucky statutes. TITLE XXXIII Administration of Trusts and Estates of Persons Under Disability
Subchapter 8 Duties and Powers of Trustee

386B.8-010.
Duty to administer trust.

Upon acceptance of a trusteeship, the trustee shall administer the trust in good faith, in accordance with its terms and purposes and the interests of the beneficiaries, and in accordance with this chapter.

History.

Enact. Acts 2014, ch. 25, § 60, effective July 15, 2014.

386B.8-020.
Duty of loyalty.

A trustee shall administer the trust solely in the interests of the beneficiaries.

Subject to the rights of persons dealing with or assisting the trustee as provided in KRS

386B.10-110

, a sale, encumbrance, or other transaction involving the investment or management of trust property entered into by the trustee for the trustee’s own personal account or which is otherwise affected by a conflict between the trustee’s fiduciary and personal interests is voidable by a beneficiary affected by the transaction unless:

The transaction was authorized by the terms of the trust;

The transaction was approved by the court;

The beneficiary did not commence a judicial proceeding within the time allowed by KRS

386B.10-050

;

The beneficiary consented to the trustee’s conduct, ratified the transaction, or released the trustee in compliance with KRS

386B.10-090

; or

The transaction involves a contract entered into or claim acquired by the trustee before the person became or contemplated becoming trustee.

A sale, encumbrance, or other transaction involving the investment or management of trust property is presumed to be affected by a conflict between personal and fiduciary interests if it is entered into by the trustee with:

The trustee’s spouse;

The trustee’s descendants, siblings, parents, or their spouses;

An agent or attorney of the trustee; or

A corporation or other person or enterprise in which the trustee, or a person that owns a significant interest in the trustee, has an interest that might affect the trustee’s best judgment.

A transaction between a trustee and a beneficiary that does not concern trust property but that occurs during the existence of the trust or while the trustee retains significant influence over the beneficiary and from which the trustee obtains an advantage is voidable by the beneficiary unless the trustee establishes that the transaction was fair to the beneficiary.

A transaction not concerning trust property in which the trustee engages in the trustee’s individual capacity involves a conflict between personal and fiduciary interests if the transaction concerns an opportunity properly belonging to the trust.

An investment by a trustee in securities of an investment company or investment trust to which the trustee, or its affiliate, provides services in a capacity other than as trustee is not presumed to be affected by a conflict between personal and fiduciary interests if the investment otherwise complies with KRS

286.3-272

regarding investments in an associated company or trust. In addition to its compensation for acting as trustee, the trustee may be compensated by the investment company or investment trust for providing those services out of fees charged to the trust. If the trustee receives compensation from the investment company or investment trust for providing investment advisory or investment management services, the trustee shall at least annually notify the persons entitled under KRS

386B.8-130

to receive a copy of the trustee’s annual report of the rate and method by which that compensation was determined.

In voting shares of stock or in exercising powers of control over similar interests in other forms of enterprise, the trustee shall act in the best interests of the beneficiaries. If the trust is the sole owner of a corporation or other form of enterprise, the trustee shall elect or appoint directors or other managers who will manage the corporation or enterprise in the best interests of the beneficiaries.

This section shall not preclude the following transactions, if fair to the beneficiaries:

An agreement between a trustee and a beneficiary relating to the appointment or compensation of the trustee;

Payment of reasonable compensation to the trustee;

A transaction between a trust and another trust, decedent’s estate, or conservatorship of which the trustee is a fiduciary or in which a beneficiary has an interest;

A deposit of trust money in a regulated financial institution operated by the trustee;

An advance by the trustee of money for the protection of the trust; or

Any transaction authorized by any other statute under the laws of this Commonwealth.

The court may appoint a special fiduciary to make a decision with respect to any proposed transaction that might violate this section if entered into by the trustee.

History.

Enact. Acts 2014, ch. 25, § 61, effective July 15, 2014.

386B.8-030.
Impartiality.

If a trust has two (2) or more beneficiaries, the trustee shall act impartially in investing, managing, and distributing the trust property, giving due regard to the beneficiaries’ respective interests.

History.

Enact. Acts 2014, ch. 25, § 62, effective July 15, 2014.

386B.8-040.
Prudent administration.

A trustee shall administer the trust as a prudent person would, by considering the purposes, terms, distributional requirements, and other circumstances of the trust. In satisfying this standard, the trustee shall exercise reasonable care, skill, and caution.

History.

Enact. Acts 2014, ch. 25, § 63, effective July 15, 2014.

386B.8-050.
Costs of administration.

In administering a trust, the trustee may incur only costs that are reasonable in relation to the trust property, the purposes of the trust, and the skills of the trustee.

History.

Enact. Acts 2014, ch. 25, § 64, effective July 15, 2014.

386B.8-060.
Trustee’s skills.

A trustee who has special skills or expertise, or is named trustee in reliance upon the trustee’s representation that the trustee has special skills or expertise, shall use those special skills or expertise.

History.

Enact. Acts 2014, ch. 25, § 65, effective July 15, 2014.

386B.8-070.
Delegation by trustee.

A trustee may delegate duties and powers that a prudent trustee of comparable skills could properly delegate under the circumstances. The trustee shall exercise reasonable care, skill, and caution in:

Selecting an agent;

Establishing the scope and terms of the delegation, consistent with the purposes and terms of the trust; and

Periodically reviewing the agent’s actions in order to monitor the agent’s performance and compliance with the terms of the delegation.

In performing a delegated function, an agent owes a duty to the trust to exercise reasonable care to comply with the terms of the delegation.

A trustee who complies with subsection (1) of this section is not liable to the beneficiaries or to the trust for an action of the agent to whom the function was delegated.

By accepting a delegation of powers or duties from the trustee of a trust that is subject to the law of this Commonwealth, an agent submits to the jurisdiction of the courts of this state.

History.

Enact. Acts 2014, ch. 25, § 66, effective July 15, 2014.

386B.8-080.
Powers to direct.

While a trust is revocable, the trustee may follow a direction of the settlor that is contrary to the terms of the trust.

If the terms of a trust confer upon a person other than the settlor of a revocable trust power to direct certain actions of the trustee, the trustee shall act in accordance with an exercise of the power unless the attempted exercise is manifestly contrary to the terms of the trust or the trustee knows the attempted exercise would constitute a breach of a fiduciary duty that the person holding the power owes to the beneficiaries of the trust.

The terms of a trust may confer upon a trustee or other person a power to direct the modification or termination of the trust.

A person, other than a beneficiary, who holds a power to direct is presumptively a fiduciary who, as such, is required to act in good faith with regard to the purposes of the trust and the interests of the beneficiaries. The holder of a power to direct is liable for any loss that results from breach of a fiduciary duty.

History.

Enact. Acts 2014, ch. 25, § 67, effective July 15, 2014.

386B.8-090.
Control and protection of trust property.

A trustee shall take reasonable steps to take control of and protect the trust property.

History.

Enact. Acts 2014, ch. 25, § 68, effective July 15, 2014.

386B.8-100.
Recordkeeping and identification of trust property.

A trustee shall keep adequate records of the administration of the trust.

A trustee shall keep trust property separate from the trustee’s own property.

Except as otherwise provided in subsection (4) of this section, a trustee shall cause the trust property to be designated so that the interest of the trust, to the extent feasible, appears in records maintained by a party other than a trustee or beneficiary.

If the trustee maintains records clearly indicating the respective interests, a trustee may invest as a whole the property of two (2) or more separate trusts.

History.

Enact. Acts 2014, ch. 25, § 69, effective July 15, 2014.

386B.8-110.
Enforcement and defense of claims.

A trustee shall take reasonable steps to enforce claims of the trust and to defend claims against the trust.

History.

Enact. Acts 2014, ch. 25, § 70, effective July 15, 2014.

386B.8-120.
Collecting trust property.

A trustee shall take reasonable steps to compel a former trustee or other person to deliver trust property to the trustee, and to redress a breach of trust known to the trustee to have been committed by a former trustee.

History.

Enact. Acts 2014, ch. 25, § 71, effective July 15, 2014.

386B.8-130.
Duty to inform and report.

Except as otherwise provided in the terms of the trust:

A trustee shall keep the qualified beneficiaries of the trust reasonably informed about the administration of the trust and of the material facts necessary for them to protect their interests. Unless unreasonable under the circumstances, a trustee shall promptly respond to a qualified beneficiary’s request for information related to the administration of the trust;

A trustee:

Within sixty (60) days after accepting a trusteeship, shall notify the qualified beneficiaries of the acceptance and of the trustee’s name, address, and telephone number;

Within sixty (60) days after the date the trustee acquires knowledge of the creation of an irrevocable trust, or the date the trustee acquires knowledge that a formerly revocable trust has become irrevocable, whether by the death of the settlor or otherwise, shall notify the qualified beneficiaries of the trust’s existence, of the identity of the settlor or settlors, of the right to request a copy of the trust instrument, and of the right to a trustee’s report as provided in paragraph (c) of this subsection; and

Shall notify the qualified beneficiaries in advance of any change in the method or rate of the trustee’s compensation;

A trustee, upon request of a qualified beneficiary, shall:

Promptly furnish to the qualified beneficiary a copy of the trust instrument; and

Send to the qualified beneficiary, at least annually and at the termination of the trust, a report of the trust property, liabilities, receipts, and disbursements, including the source and amount of the trustee’s compensation, a listing of the trust assets and, if feasible, their respective market values. Upon a vacancy in a trusteeship, unless a cotrustee remains in office, a report shall be sent to the qualified beneficiary by the former trustee. A personal representative, conservator, guardian, or curator may send the qualified beneficiary a report on behalf of a deceased or incapacitated trustee; and

A qualified beneficiary may waive the right to a trustee’s report or other information otherwise required to be furnished under this section. A qualified beneficiary, with respect to future reports and other information, may withdraw a waiver previously given; and

Notwithstanding subsection (1) of this section and regardless of the terms of the trust, the trustee shall have a duty to notify and to report to at least one (1) qualified beneficiary of an irrevocable trust who has attained twenty-five (25) years of age, or a designated person having a fiduciary relationship to a qualified beneficiary, of the existence of the trust, of the identity of the trustee, and of his or her right to request trustee’s reports. If the terms of the trust mandate a trustee to notify no one, then the trustee may designate a qualified beneficiary or person having a fiduciary relationship to a qualified beneficiary to notify and report to, and such designation by the trustee is not subject to any liability for breach of trust or otherwise.

Subsections (1)(b)1. and 2. and (2) of this section do not apply to a trustee who accepts a trusteeship before July 15, 2014, to an irrevocable trust created before July 15, 2014, or to a revocable trust that becomes irrevocable before July 15, 2014.

The District Court shall have exclusive jurisdiction over matters under this section.

History.

Enact. Acts 2014, ch. 25, § 72, effective July 15, 2014.

386B.8-140.
Discretionary powers — Tax savings.

The judicial standard of review for a discretionary power is that the trustee shall exercise the power reasonably, in good faith, and in accordance with the terms and purposes of the trust and the interests of the beneficiaries, except that a reasonableness standard shall not be applied to the exercise of discretion by the trustee if the terms of the trust so provide. The words “sole,” “absolute,” “uncontrolled,” or words of similar import in the absence of any standards to guide the trustee in exercising its discretion mean that a reasonableness standard will not apply. The greater the grant of discretion by the settlor to the trustee, the broader the range of permissible conduct by the trustee in exercising it.

Subject to subsection (4) of this section, and unless the terms of the trust expressly indicate that a rule in this subsection shall not apply:

A person other than a settlor who is a beneficiary and trustee of a trust that confers on the trustee a power to make discretionary distributions to or for the trustee’s personal benefit may exercise the power only in accordance with an ascertainable standard; and

A trustee may not exercise a power to make discretionary distributions to satisfy a legal obligation of support that the trustee personally owes another person.

A power whose exercise is limited or prohibited by subsection (2) of this section may be exercised by a majority of the remaining trustees whose exercise of the power is not so limited or prohibited. If the power of all trustees is so limited or prohibited, the court may appoint a special fiduciary with authority to exercise the power.

Subsection (2) of this section shall not apply to:

A power held by the settlor’s spouse who is the trustee of a trust for which a marital deduction, as defined in 26

U.S.C. sec. 2056(b)(5)

or 2523(e), as in effect on July 15, 2014, or as later amended, was previously allowed;

Any trust during any period that the trust may be revoked or amended by its settlor; or

A trust if contributions to the trust qualify for the annual exclusion under 26

U.S.C. sec. 2503(c)

, as in effect on July 15, 2014, or as later amended.

History.

Enact. Acts 2014, ch. 25, § 73, effective July 15, 2014.

386B.8-150.
General powers of trustee.

A trustee, without authorization by the court, may exercise:

Powers conferred by the terms of the trust; and

Except as limited by the terms of the trust:

All powers over the trust property which an unmarried competent owner has over individually owned property;

Any other powers appropriate to achieve the proper investment, management, and distribution of the trust property; and

Any other powers conferred by this chapter.

The exercise of a power is subject to the fiduciary duties prescribed by this subchapter.

History.

Enact. Acts 2014, ch. 25, § 74, effective July 15, 2014.

386B.8-160.
Specific powers of trustee.

Without limiting the authority conferred by KRS

386B.8-150

, a trustee may:

Collect trust property and accept or reject additions to the trust property from a settlor or any other person;

Acquire or sell property, for cash or on credit, at public or private sale;

Exchange, partition, or otherwise change the character of trust property, including acquiring an undivided interest;

Deposit trust money in an account in a regulated financial institution;

Borrow money, with or without security, and mortgage or pledge trust property for a period within or extending beyond the duration of the trust, advance money for the protection of the trust, and for all expenses, losses, and liability sustained in the administration of the trust or because of the holding or ownership of any trust assets, for which advances with any interest the trustee has a lien on the trust assets as against the beneficiary;

With respect to an interest in a proprietorship, partnership, limited liability company, business trust, corporation, or other form of business or enterprise, continue the business or other enterprise and take any action that may be taken by shareholders, members, or property owners, including merging, dissolving, or otherwise changing the form of business organization or contributing additional capital;

With respect to stocks or other securities, exercise the rights of an absolute owner, including the right to:

Vote, or give proxies to vote, with or without power of substitution, or enter into or continue a voting trust agreement;

Hold a security in the name of a nominee or in other form without disclosure of the trust so that title may pass by delivery;

Pay calls, assessments, and other sums chargeable or accruing against the securities, and sell or exercise stock subscription or conversion rights;

Deposit the securities with a depositary or other regulated financial institution;

Sell or exchange stock subscription or conversion rights; and

Consent directly or through a committee or other agent, to the reorganization, consolidation, merger, dissolution, or liquidation of a corporation or other business enterprise;

With respect to an interest in real property, construct or make ordinary or extraordinary repairs to, alterations to, or improvements in, buildings or other structures, demolish improvements, raze existing or erect new party walls or buildings, subdivide or develop land, dedicate land to public use or grant public or private easements, and make or vacate plats and adjust boundaries;

Enter into a lease for any purpose as lessor or lessee, including a lease or other arrangement for exploration and removal of natural resources, with or without the option to purchase or renew, for a period within or extending beyond the duration of the trust;

Grant an option involving a sale, lease, or other disposition of trust property or acquire an option for the acquisition of property, including an option exercisable beyond the duration of the trust, and exercise an option so acquired;

Insure the property of the trust against damage or loss and insure the trustee, the trustee’s agents, and beneficiaries against liability arising from the administration of the trust;

Abandon or decline to administer property of no value or of insufficient value to justify its collection or continued administration;

With respect to possible liability for violation of environmental law:

Inspect or investigate property the trustee holds or has been asked to hold, or property owned or operated by an organization in which the trustee holds or has been asked to hold an interest, for the purpose of determining the application of environmental law with respect to the property;

Take action to prevent, abate, or otherwise remedy any actual or potential violation of any environmental law affecting property held directly or indirectly by the trustee, whether taken before or after the assertion of a claim or the initiation of governmental enforcement;

Decline to accept property into trust or disclaim any power with respect to property that is or may be burdened with liability for violation of environmental law;

Compromise claims against the trust which may be asserted for an alleged violation of environmental law; and

Pay the expense of any inspection, review, abatement, or remedial action to comply with environmental law;

Pay or contest any claim, settle a claim by or against the trust, and release, in whole or in part, a claim belonging to the trust;

Pay taxes, assessments, compensation of the trustee and of employees and agents of the trust, and other expenses incurred in the administration of the trust;

Exercise elections with respect to federal, state, and local taxes;

Select a mode of payment under any employee benefit or retirement plan, annuity, or life insurance payable to the trustee, exercise rights thereunder, including exercise of the right to indemnification for expenses and against liabilities, and take appropriate action to collect the proceeds;

Make loans out of trust property, including loans to a beneficiary on terms and conditions the trustee considers to be fair and reasonable under the circumstances, and the trustee has a lien on future distributions for repayment of those loans;

Pledge trust property to guarantee loans made by others to the beneficiary;

Appoint a trustee to act in another jurisdiction with respect to trust property located in the other jurisdiction, confer upon the appointed trustee all of the powers and duties of the appointing trustee, require that the appointed trustee furnish security, and remove any trustee so appointed;

Pay an amount distributable to a beneficiary who is under a legal disability or who the trustee reasonably believes is incapacitated, by paying it directly to the beneficiary or applying it for the beneficiary’s benefit, or by:

Paying it to the beneficiary’s conservator or, if the beneficiary does not have a conservator, the beneficiary’s guardian;

Paying it to the beneficiary’s custodian under KRS

385.022

to

385.242

, the Kentucky Uniform Transfers to Minors Act or custodial trustee under the Uniform Custodial Trust Act, if that Act is subsequently adopted by the Commonwealth, and, for that purpose, creating a custodianship or custodial trust;

If the trustee does not know of a conservator, guardian, custodian, or custodial trustee, paying it to an adult relative or other person having legal or physical care or custody of the beneficiary, to be expended on the beneficiary’s behalf; or

Managing it as a separate fund on the beneficiary’s behalf, subject to the beneficiary’s continuing right to withdraw the distribution;

On distribution of trust property or the division or termination of a trust, make distributions in divided or undivided interests, allocate particular assets in proportionate or disproportionate shares, value the trust property for those purposes, and adjust for resulting differences in valuation;

Resolve a dispute concerning the interpretation of the trust or its administration by mediation, arbitration, or other procedure for alternative dispute resolution;

Prosecute or defend an action, claim, or judicial proceeding in any jurisdiction to protect trust property and the trustee in the performance of the trustee’s duties;

Sign and deliver contracts and other instruments that are useful to achieve or facilitate the exercise of the trustee’s powers;

Take such actions as are necessary to cause gains from the sale or exchange of trust assets, as determined for federal income tax purposes, to be taxed for federal income tax purposes as a part of a distribution of income, including the power to:

Allocate such gains to income for the purpose of making discretionary distributions; and

Allocate such gains to income that has been increased by an adjustment from principal to income pursuant to KRS

386.454

, to a unitrust distribution, or to a distribution of principal to a beneficiary;

Invest and reinvest trust assets in accordance with the provisions of the trust or as provided by law;

Allocate items of income or expense to either trust income or principal, as provided by law;

In addition to the power to delegate under KRS

386B.8-070

, employ persons, including attorneys, auditors, investment advisors, or agents, to:

Advise or assist the trustee in the performance of his administrative duties;

Act without independent investigation upon their recommendations; and

Instead of acting personally, to employ one (1) or more agents to perform any act of administration, whether or not discretionary; and

On termination of the trust, exercise the powers appropriate to wind up the administration of the trust and distribute the trust property to the persons entitled to it within a reasonable amount of time.

History.

Enact. Acts 2014, ch. 25, § 75, effective July 15, 2014.

386B.8-170.
Distribution upon termination.

Upon termination or partial termination of a trust, the trustee may send to the beneficiaries a proposal for distribution. The right of any beneficiary to object to the proposed distribution terminates if the beneficiary does not notify the trustee of an objection within thirty (30) days after the proposal was sent, but only if the proposal informed the beneficiary of the right to object and of the time allowed for objection.

Upon the occurrence of an event terminating or partially terminating a trust, the trustee shall proceed expeditiously to distribute the trust property to the persons entitled to it, subject to the right of the trustee to retain a reasonable reserve for the payment of debts, expenses, and taxes.

A release by a beneficiary of a trustee from liability for breach of trust is invalid to the extent:

It was induced by improper conduct of the trustee; or

The beneficiary, at the time of the release, did not know of the beneficiary’s rights or of the material facts relating to the breach.

History.

Enact. Acts 2014, ch. 25, § 76, effective July 15, 2014.

386B.8-180.
Duties of trustee upon termination or upon removal of trustee — Objection.

When a trust terminates pursuant to the terms of the trust, the trustee may follow the requirements for distribution upon termination as provided in KRS

386B.8-170

or, if proceeding under this section, within a reasonable amount of time after such termination, the trustee shall provide to the qualified beneficiaries a statement showing the fair market value of the net assets to be distributed, a trust accounting for the prior five (5) years and an estimate for any items reasonably anticipated but not yet received or disbursed, the amount of any fees, including trustee fees, remaining to be paid, and notice that the trust is terminating. The trustee may also provide such statement and notice to any other person whom the trustee reasonably believes may have an interest in the trust.

If, after receiving the notice and trust information described in paragraph (a) of this subsection, a qualified beneficiary objects to an action or omission disclosed, he or she shall provide written notice of the objection to the trustee within forty-five (45) days of the notice having been sent by the trustee. If no written objection is provided within the forty-five (45) day time period, the information provided pursuant to paragraph (a) of this subsection shall be considered approved by the recipient and the trustee shall, within a reasonable period of time following the expiration of such period, distribute the assets as provided in the trust. If the trustee receives a written objection within the applicable forty-five (45) day time period, the trustee may:

Submit the written objection to the District Court for resolution and charge the expense of commencing such a proceeding to the trust; or

Resolve the objection with the qualified beneficiary, whether by nonjudicial settlement agreement or otherwise. Any agreement entered into pursuant to this paragraph may include a release, an indemnity clause, or both on the part of the beneficiary against the trustee relating to the trust. If the parties agree to a nonjudicial settlement agreement, any related expenses shall be charged to the trust.

Upon a resolution of an objection pursuant to subparagraph 1. or 2. of this paragraph, within a reasonable period of time thereafter the trustee shall distribute the remaining trust assets as provided in the trust.

The trustee may rely upon the written statement of a person receiving notice that such person does not object.

When a trustee is removed or resigns pursuant to the terms of the trust, the trustee may follow the requirements for distribution upon termination as provided in KRS

386B.8-170

or, if proceeding under this section, the trustee, within a reasonable time after such removal or resignation,shall provide to the successor trustee a statement showing the net assets to be distributed, a trust accounting for the prior five (5) years, an estimate for any items reasonably anticipated but not yet received or disbursed, the amount of any fees, including trustee fees, remaining to be paid, and notice that the trustee has resigned or been removed. The trustee may also provide such statement and notice to any other person whom trustee reasonably believes may have an interest in the trust.

Any person provided notice and trust information as described in paragraph (a) of this subsection who objects to an action or omission disclosed shall provide written notice of the objection to the trustee within forty-five (45) days of the notice having been sent by the trustee. If no written objection is provided within the forty-five (45) day time period, the information provided pursuant to paragraph (a) of this subsection will be considered approved, and the trustee shall, within a reasonable period following the expiration of such forty-five (45) day period, distribute the assets to the successor trustee. If the trustee receives a written objection within the applicable forty-five (45) day time period, the trustee may:

Submit the written objection to the District Court for resolution and charge the expense of commencing such a proceeding to the trust; or

Resolve the objection with the opposing party, whether by nonjudicial settlement agreement or otherwise. Any agreement entered into pursuant to this paragraph may include a release, an indemnity clause, or both on the part of the opposing party against the trustee relating to the trust. If the parties agree to a nonjudicial settlement agreement, any related expenses shall be charged to the trust.

Upon a resolution of any objection raised by an opposing party pursuant to subparagraph 1. or 2. of this paragraph, within a reasonable period of time thereafter the trustee shall distribute the remaining trust assets as provided in the trust.

The trustee may rely upon the written statement of a person receiving notice that such person does not object.

When a trustee distributes assets of the trust pursuant to subsection (1) or (2) of this section, the limitations in KRS

386B.6-040

and

386B.10-050

are waived by each person who received notice and either consented or failed to object pursuant to this section, and any such person is barred from bringing a claim against the trustee for breach of trust or challenging the validity of the trust, to the same extent and with the same preclusive effect as if the court had entered a final order approving the trustee’s final account.

Notice provided under subsection (1) or (2) of this section shall clearly warn of the impending bar of claims against a trustee under KRS

386B.6-040

and

386B.10-050

that will result if an objection is not timely made.

No trustee trust shall request that any beneficiary indemnify the trustee against loss in exchange for the trustee forgoing a request to the court to approve its accounts at the time the trust terminates or at the time the trustee is removed or resigns, except as agreed upon by the parties pursuant to paragraph (b)1. or 2. of subsections (1) and (2) of this section.

The District Court shall have exclusive jurisdiction over matters under this section.

History.

Enact. Acts 2014, ch. 25, § 77, effective July 15, 2014; 2015 ch. 121, § 2, effective June 24, 2015.